New York, session 2025-2026, A614.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000), or so much 2 thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the department of 3 transportation out of any moneys in the state treasury in the general 4 fund to the credit of the general fund, not otherwise appropriated, and 5 made immediately available, for the purpose of capital improvements to 6 the historic Forrest Hills Overpass. Such moneys shall be payable on the 7 audit and warrant of the comptroller on vouchers certified or approved 8 by the comptroller, in consultation with the commissioner of transporta- 9 tion, in the manner prescribed by law. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01342-01-5